Hawaii statutes.
§189-10 Commercial marine dealers.
(a) The department may require a license of any commercial marine dealer to
sell or offer for sale, to purchase or attempt to purchase, to exchange, or to
act as an agent in the transfer of, any marine life taken within the
jurisdiction of the State for commercial purposes. It is unlawful for any
commercial marine dealer to sell or offer for sale, to purchase or attempt to
purchase, to exchange, or to act as an agent in the transfer of, any marine
life taken within the jurisdiction of the State for commercial purpose, that is
obtained from any person whom the department has required to have, but does not
have, a valid commercial marine license, commercial marine dealer license, or
other license or permit authorizing such sale, purchase, exchange, or transfer
for commercial purpose.

(b) The department may require a license of
any person to export any marine life taken within the jurisdiction of the State
for commercial purpose.

(c) Upon the written demand of the department,
a commercial marine dealer shall render to the department a true and correct
statement showing the name of the commercial marine dealer; year; month; day;
weight; number; value of each of the species of marine life purchased,
transferred, exchanged, or sold during the previous month; name and current
license number of the commercial marine licensee from whom the marine life was
obtained; and such other information as the department may require.

(d) The department may require any term or
condition of the licenses issued pursuant to this section, including, but not
limited to, reports, fees and exemptions. The department may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 for the purposes of this section. [L 1925, c 202, §1; am
L 1929, c 115, §1; RL 1935, §380; RL 1945, §1265; am L 1945, c 24, §1; RL 1955,
§21-122; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §189-10; am L
1981, c 85, §84; am L 1986, c 2, §1; am L 1997, c 307, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next